Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Part 3

Licensure of Physical Therapists and Assistants

63-13-301. License requirement.

A physical therapist, or physiotherapist, licensed under this chapter is fully authorized to practice physical therapy.

A physical therapist, or physiotherapist, is not licensed under this chapter unless the individual holds a degree from a professional physical therapy program accredited by a national accreditation agency recognized by the United States department of education and by the board of physical therapy.

No person shall practice or in any manner claim to be engaging in the practice of physical therapy or designate as being a physical therapist unless duly licensed as a physical therapist in accordance with this chapter.

Acts 1999, ch. 528, § 12; 2020, ch. 790, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 63-13-301 — 63-13-313, was transferred to part 2 of this chapter in 1986.

Former part 3 of this chapter, concerning licensure of physical therapists and assistants, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 1999, ch. 528, § 10, effective June 21, 1999. The former provisions, excluding those previously transferred, were §§ 63-3-301 — 63-3-310 (Acts 1984, ch. 921, § 4; T.C.A., §§ 63-13-401 — 63-13-410; Acts 1988, ch. 824, §§ 5-16; 1989, ch. 360, § 45; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 33-38; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 86, 112; 1991, ch. 245, §§ 5-13; 1992, ch. 998, §§ 1, 2; 1993, ch. 225, §§ 2, 3; 1994, ch. 901, § 4; 1995, ch. 226, §§ 4-7; 1998, ch. 974, § 1).

Acts 2020, ch. 790, § 17 provided that the act, which amended this section, applies to actions occurring on or after July 15, 2020.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment, in (a)(1), inserted “, or physiotherapist” and deleted “as defined in this chapter” following “physical therapy”; and added (a)(2).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 790, § 17. July 15, 2020.

Attorney General Opinions. Provision of physical therapy services by a non-professional corporation, OAG 94-131, 1994 Tenn. AG LEXIS 144 (11/8/94).

63-13-302. Referrals — Ethical standards.

A physical therapist shall refer persons under the physical therapist's care to appropriate health care practitioners, after consultation with the referring practitioner, if the physical therapist has reasonable cause to believe symptoms or conditions are present that require services beyond the scope of practice or when physical therapy treatment is contraindicated.

Physical therapists shall adhere to the recognized standards of ethics of the physical therapy profession and as further established by rule.

Acts 1999, ch. 528, § 13.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 63-13-301 — 63-13-313, was transferred to part 2 of this chapter in 1986.

Former part 3 of this chapter, concerning licensure of physical therapists and assistants, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 1999, ch. 528, § 10, effective June 21, 1999. The former provisions, excluding those previously transferred, were §§ 63-3-301 — 63-3-310 (Acts 1984, ch. 921, § 4; T.C.A., §§ 63-13-401 — 63-13-410; Acts 1988, ch. 824, §§ 5-16; 1989, ch. 360, § 45; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 33-38; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 86, 112; 1991, ch. 245, §§ 5-13; 1992, ch. 998, §§ 1, 2; 1993, ch. 225, §§ 2, 3; 1994, ch. 901, § 4; 1995, ch. 226, §§ 4-7; 1998, ch. 974, § 1).

63-13-303. Exceptions to referral requirements.

The practice of physical therapy must be under the written or oral referral of a referring practitioner who is a licensed doctor of medicine, chiropractic, dentistry, podiatry, or osteopathy, except a licensed physical therapist may:

Conduct an initial patient visit without referral;

Provide physical assessments or instructions, including a recommendation of exercise to an asymptomatic person, without the referral of a referring practitioner;

In emergency circumstances, including minor emergencies, provide assistance to a person to the best of a physical therapist's ability without the referral of a referring practitioner. Except as provided in subdivision (a)(4), the physical therapist shall refer the person to the appropriate healthcare practitioner, as indicated, immediately after providing assistance;

For the purposes of subdivision (a)(3)(A):

“Emergency circumstances” means instances where emergency medical care is required; and

“Emergency medical care” means bona fide emergency services provided after the sudden onset of a medical condition manifesting itself by acute symptoms of sufficient severity, including severe pain, such that the absence of immediate medical attention could reasonably be expected to result in:

Placing the patient's health in serious jeopardy;

Serious impairment to bodily functions; or

Serious dysfunction of any bodily organ or part; and

Treat a patient without a referral when, within the scope of practice of physical therapy, the following are met:

The patient's physician, as defined in § 63-6-204(f)(7) has been notified;

If the physical therapist determines, based on clinical evidence, that no progress has been made with respect to that patient's condition within thirty (30) days, immediately following the date of the patient's initial visit with the physical therapist, then the physical therapist shall not provide any additional physical therapy services and shall refer the patient to a healthcare practitioner who qualifies as a referring practitioner;

Physical therapy services must not continue beyond ninety (90) days without consulting with the patient's appropriate healthcare practitioner;

If the patient was previously diagnosed by a licensed physician with chronic, neuromuscular, or developmental conditions, and the evaluation, treatment, or services are being provided for problems or symptoms associated with one (1) or more of those previously diagnosed conditions, then subdivisions (a)(4)(B) and (a)(4)(C) do not apply; and

A physical therapist shall refer patients under the physical therapist's care to appropriate healthcare practitioners, if, at any time, the physical therapist has reasonable cause to believe symptoms or conditions are present that require services beyond the scope of practice of a physical therapist, reasonable therapeutic progress is not being achieved for the patient, or physical therapy treatment is contraindicated.

No person shall practice physical therapy other than upon the referral of a patient by a person who is licensed in this or another state to practice medicine, chiropractic, dentistry, osteopathic medicine or podiatric medicine, within the scope of those practices, and whose license is in good standing and who holds a CPR certificate or its equivalent, unless one of the following conditions is met:

The person holds a master's or doctorate degree from a professional physical therapy program that is accredited by a national accreditation agency recognized by the United States department of education and by the board of physical therapy and the person has completed at least one (1) year of experience as a licensed physical therapist;

The person has successfully completed a residency or clinical fellowship in physical therapy at a program approved by the board; or

The person has completed at least three (3) years of experience as a licensed physical therapist; and

The person has completed a course approved by the board of physical therapy and offered by an accredited university of at least fifteen (15) hours, designed to enable the physical therapist to identify signs and symptoms of systemic disease, particularly those that can mimic cardiological, neurological, oncological or musculoskeletal disorders and to recognize conditions that require timely referral to a physician, dentist, osteopath, podiatrist or chiropractor.

It is unprofessional conduct, for the purposes of § 63-13-312, for a physical therapist to knowingly initiate services to a patient in violation of subdivision (a)(4).

Acts 1999, ch. 528, § 14; 2007, ch. 115, § 10; 2007, ch. 423, § 2; 2020, ch. 790, §§ 4, 5.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 63-13-301 — 63-13-313, was transferred to part 2 of this chapter in 1986.

Former part 3 of this chapter, concerning licensure of physical therapists and assistants, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 1999, ch. 528, § 10, effective June 21, 1999. The former provisions, excluding those previously transferred, were §§ 63-3-301 — 63-3-310 (Acts 1984, ch. 921, § 4; T.C.A., §§ 63-13-401 — 63-13-410; Acts 1988, ch. 824, §§ 5-16; 1989, ch. 360, § 45; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 33-38; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 86, 112; 1991, ch. 245, §§ 5-13; 1992, ch. 998, §§ 1, 2; 1993, ch. 225, §§ 2, 3; 1994, ch. 901, § 4; 1995, ch. 226, §§ 4-7; 1998, ch. 974, § 1).

Acts 2020, ch. 790, § 17 provided that the act, which amended this section, applies to actions occurring on or after July 15, 2020.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment, in (a), substituted “must” for “shall” and inserted “referring practitioner who is a”; substituted “initial patient visit” for “initial evaluation of a patient” in (a)(1); in (a)(3)(A), inserted “physical” following “best of a” and substituted “healthcare” for “health care”; rewrote (a)(4) which read: “(4) Treat a patient without a referral when all of the following apply: (A) When a patient provides the name of a licensed doctor of medicine, chiropractic, dentistry, podiatry or osteopathy and expressly wants the physical therapist to inform that physician, the physical therapist shall inform the patient's licensed doctor of medicine, chiropractic, dentistry, podiatry or osteopathy no later than five (5) business days after the evaluation. A consultation shall occur between the physical therapist and the patient's licensed doctor of medicine, chiropractic, dentistry, podiatry or osteopathy within the first six (6) visits or fifteen (15) business days, whichever comes first, of the findings of the patient's initial visit for physical therapy and any subsequent visits. Should that consultation not take place, no further therapy beyond the six (6) visits or fifteen (15) days, whichever comes first, shall be delivered; (B) When a patient does not provide the name of a licensed doctor of medicine, chiropractic, dentistry, podiatry or osteopathy or expressly states to the therapist that the patient does not want a licensed doctor of medicine, chiropractic, dentistry, podiatry or osteopathy informed of the initiation of therapy services, the therapist shall have the patient sign a consent form that confirms the patient either does not have a licensed doctor of medicine, chiropractic, dentistry, podiatry or osteopathy or does not want a licensed doctor of medicine, chiropractic, dentistry, podiatry or osteopathy informed of the initiation of therapy treatment. The consent form shall be maintained in the patient's record; (C) If the patient presents to the physical therapist for a problem for which the patient has been seen by a licensed doctor of medicine, chiropractic, dentistry, podiatry or osteopathy within the past twelve (12) months, the consent of the patient is not necessary to inform that licensed doctor of medicine, chiropractic, dentistry, podiatry or osteopathy of the presentation for the physical therapy treatment. If the patient has no licensed doctor of medicine, chiropractic, dentistry, podiatry or osteopathy, then the physical therapist shall make a suggestion from the list of available providers and shall inform the patient of the thirty-day limitation in subdivision (a)(4)(E); (D) If the physical therapist determines, based on reasonable evidence, that no substantial progress has been made with respect to that patient within fifteen (15) calendar days or six (6) visits, whichever occurs first, immediately following the date of the patient's initial visit with the physical therapist, the physical therapist shall not provide any additional physical therapy services and shall refer the patient to a licensed physician, doctor of chiropractic, dentist, podiatrist or osteopath. If the patient previously was diagnosed with chronic, neuromuscular or developmental conditions by a physician, doctor of chiropractic, dentist, podiatrist or osteopath and the evaluation, treatment or services are being provided for problems or symptoms associated with one (1) or more of those previously diagnosed conditions, then this subdivision (a)(4)(D) shall not apply. If a patient returns to the physical therapist within ninety (90) days of treatment with the same complaint, then the physical therapist shall make an immediate referral to the appropriate health care provider; (E) When a patient's licensed doctor of medicine, chiropractic, dentistry, podiatry or osteopathy has not been notified of the physical therapy services, under no circumstances should therapy services continue beyond thirty (30) days immediately following the date of the patient's first visit; (F) (i) It shall be considered unprofessional conduct for the purposes of § 63-13-312 for a physical therapist to knowingly initiate services for the same complaint for which a patient: (a) Has started therapy services but another therapist did not inform a licensed doctor of medicine, chiropractic, dentistry, podiatry or osteopathy within five (5) business days of the initial evaluation in accordance with subdivision (a)(4)(A); (b) Has reached the fifteen (15) day and six (6) visit limit imposed by subdivision (a)(4)(D) where no substantial progress has been made from another physical therapist; or (c) Has reached the thirty-day limit imposed by subdivision (a)(4)(E); (ii) This subdivision (a)(4)(F) does not apply if a referral from a licensed doctor of medicine, chiropractic, dentistry, podiatry or osteopathy is made; and (G) If, at any time, the physical therapist has reason to believe that the patient has symptoms or conditions that require treatment or services beyond the scope of practice of a physical therapist, the physical therapist shall refer the patient to a licensed health care practitioner acting within the practitioner's scope of practice.”; and added (c)

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 790, § 17. July 15, 2020.

63-13-304. Board powers and duties.

The board of physical therapy has the power and authority to:

Evaluate the qualifications of applicants for licensure and provide for the examination of physical therapists and physical therapist assistants;

Adopt passing scores for examination;

Issue licenses to those who qualify under this chapter;

Regulate the practice of physical therapy by interpreting and enforcing this chapter, including disciplinary action;

Adopt and revise rules, as it deems necessary and appropriate, consistent with this chapter, for the discharge of its obligation under this section. Such rules, when lawfully adopted, shall have the effect of law;

Establish requirements for assessing continuing competence of licensees; and

Assess all license and registration fees.

The board of physical therapy shall establish minimum competency requirements that a physical therapist shall demonstrate in order to practice dry needling.

Acts 1999, ch. 528, § 15; 2007, ch. 115, § 10; 2015, ch. 124, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 63-13-301 — 63-13-313, was transferred to part 2 of this chapter in 1986.

Former part 3 of this chapter, concerning licensure of physical therapists and assistants, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 1999, ch. 528, § 10, effective June 21, 1999. The former provisions, excluding those previously transferred, were §§ 63-3-301 — 63-3-310 (Acts 1984, ch. 921, § 4; T.C.A., §§ 63-13-401 — 63-13-410; Acts 1988, ch. 824, §§ 5-16; 1989, ch. 360, § 45; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 33-38; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 86, 112; 1991, ch. 245, §§ 5-13; 1992, ch. 998, §§ 1, 2; 1993, ch. 225, §§ 2, 3; 1994, ch. 901, § 4; 1995, ch. 226, §§ 4-7; 1998, ch. 974, § 1).

63-13-305. Claims and practices of other licensed professionals — Exemptions from licensure.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as restricting a person licensed or certified under any other law of this state from engaging in the profession or practice for which the person is licensed or certified; provided, that the person does not claim to be a physical therapist, a physical therapist assistant or a provider of physical therapy.

The following persons shall be exempt from licensure as a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant under this chapter:

A person who is pursuing a course of study leading to a degree as a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant in a professional education program approved by the board and is satisfying supervised clinical education requirements related to physical therapy education;

A physical therapist or physical therapist assistant while practicing in the United States armed services, United States public health service or veterans administration as based on requirements under federal regulations for state licensure of health care providers;

A physical therapist or physical therapist assistant licensed in another United States jurisdiction, or a foreign-educated or internationally trained physical therapist credentialed in another country, performing physical therapy as part of teaching or participating in an educational seminar of no more than sixty (60) days in a calendar year; and

A physical therapist or physical therapist assistant licensed in another United States jurisdiction who is temporarily performing physical therapy for members of established athletic teams, athletic corporations or performing arts companies that are training, competing or performing in Tennessee; provided, however, that a person performing physical therapy in this state pursuant to this subdivision (b)(4) shall agree to use the secretary of state for service of process pursuant to title 20, chapter 2, part 2.

The practice of dry needling by a physical therapist licensed under this chapter shall not constitute the practice of acupuncture under chapter 6, part 10 of this title.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as restricting persons licensed under any other law of this state from performing physical agent modalities for which they have received education and training.

Acts 1999, ch. 528, § 16; 2003, ch. 8, § 1; 2007, ch. 115, § 10; 2015, ch. 124, § 4; 2020, ch. 790, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 63-13-301 — 63-13-313, was transferred to part 2 of this chapter in 1986.

Former part 3 of this chapter, concerning licensure of physical therapists and assistants, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 1999, ch. 528, § 10, effective June 21, 1999. The former provisions, excluding those previously transferred, were §§ 63-3-301 — 63-3-310 (Acts 1984, ch. 921, § 4; T.C.A., §§ 63-13-401 — 63-13-410; Acts 1988, ch. 824, §§ 5-16; 1989, ch. 360, § 45; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 33-38; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 86, 112; 1991, ch. 245, §§ 5-13; 1992, ch. 998, §§ 1, 2; 1993, ch. 225, §§ 2, 3; 1994, ch. 901, § 4; 1995, ch. 226, §§ 4-7; 1998, ch. 974, § 1).

Acts 2020, ch. 790, § 17 provided that the act, which amended this section, applies to actions occurring on or after July 15, 2020.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment inserted “or internationally trained” in (b)(3).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 790, § 17. July 15, 2020.

63-13-306. Application — Examinations.

An applicant for licensure as a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant shall file an application as required by the board. A nonrefundable application fee and cost of the examination shall accompany the completed written or online application. Fees shall be established by the rules promulgated by the board.

After the application process has been completed, an applicant shall take the examination for physical therapist licensure that covers current physical therapy practice.

After the application process has been completed, an applicant shall take the examination for physical therapist assistant licensure that covers current technical application of physical therapy services.

Examinations shall be available within the state at such time and place as the board shall determine. The board shall determine the passing score.

Applicants who do not pass the examination after the first attempt may retake the examination one (1) additional time without reapplication for licensure up to a total of six (6) attempts. Applications remain active for twelve (12) months. After twelve (12) months, applicants must submit a new application with all applicable fees.

Acts 1999, ch. 528, § 17; 2007, ch. 115, § 10; 2014, ch. 949, § 11; 2020, ch. 790, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 63-13-301 — 63-13-313, was transferred to part 2 of this chapter in 1986.

Former part 3 of this chapter, concerning licensure of physical therapists and assistants, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 1999, ch. 528, § 10, effective June 21, 1999. The former provisions, excluding those previously transferred, were §§ 63-3-301 — 63-3-310 (Acts 1984, ch. 921, § 4; T.C.A., §§ 63-13-401 — 63-13-410; Acts 1988, ch. 824, §§ 5-16; 1989, ch. 360, § 45; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 33-38; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 86, 112; 1991, ch. 245, §§ 5-13; 1992, ch. 998, §§ 1, 2; 1993, ch. 225, §§ 2, 3; 1994, ch. 901, § 4; 1995, ch. 226, §§ 4-7; 1998, ch. 974, § 1).

Acts 2020, ch. 790, § 17 provided that the act, which amended this section, applies to actions occurring on or after July 15, 2020.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment, in (e), in the first sentence, substituted “up to a total of” for “This must occur within” and deleted “months of initial board approval to take the examination. Prior to being approved by the board for subsequent testing beyond two (2)” preceding “attempts” and “individuals shall” following the same, added the second sentence, and in the last sentence, inserted “After twelve (12) months, applicants must” and deleted “and demonstrate evidence satisfactory to the board of having successfully completed additional clinical training and/or course work as determined by the board and defined in the rules.” following “fees.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 790, § 17. July 15, 2020.

Cross-References. Licensure, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.

63-13-307. Qualifications of applicants — Reciprocity.

An applicant for licensure as a physical therapist shall have the following qualifications:

[Deleted by 2020 amendment.]

Be of good moral character;

Have completed the application process;

Be a graduate of a professional physical therapy program accredited by a national accreditation agency recognized by the United States department of education and by the board of physical therapy; and

Have successfully passed an examination approved by the board.

An applicant for license as a physical therapist assistant shall meet the following requirements:

[Deleted by 2020 amendment.]

Be of good moral character;

Have completed the application process;

Be a graduate of a physical therapist assistant education program accredited by an accreditation agency approved by the board; and

Have successfully passed an examination approved by the board.

The board shall issue a license to a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant who has a valid unrestricted license from another United States jurisdiction in which such person, when granted such license, previously met all requirements as specified in subsections (a) and (b) and as further established by rules promulgated by the board.

An applicant for licensure as a physical therapist who has been educated outside the United States, foreign-educated, or internationally trained shall meet the following qualifications:

[Deleted by 2020 amendment.]

Be of good moral character;

Have completed the application process;

Provide satisfactory evidence that the applicant's education is substantially equivalent to the requirements of physical therapists educated in accredited educational programs as determined by the board. If the board determines that a foreign-educated applicant's education is not substantially equivalent, it may require completion of additional course work before proceeding with the application process;

Provide written proof that the school of physical therapy education is recognized by its own ministry of education;

Provide written proof of authorization to practice as a physical therapist without limitations in the country where the professional education occurred;

Provide proof of legal authorization to reside and seek employment in the United States or its territories;

Have the applicant's educational credentials evaluated by a board-approved credential evaluation agency;

Have passed the board approved English proficiency examinations, if the applicant's native language is not English;

Have participated in and completed an interim supervised clinical practice period prior to licensure; and

Have successfully passed the examination approved by the board.

Notwithstanding this section, if the foreign-educated physical therapist applicant is a graduate of a professional physical therapy education program accredited by an agency approved by the board, the requirements in subdivisions (d)(4), (5), (8) and (10) may be waived.

In determining the qualifications of an applicant for licensure as a physical therapist or as a physical therapist assistant, only a majority vote of the board of physical therapy shall be required.

Acts 1999, ch. 528, § 18; 2007, ch. 115, § 10; 2020, ch. 790, §§ 8-11.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 63-13-301 — 63-13-313, was transferred to part 2 of this chapter in 1986.

Former part 3 of this chapter, concerning licensure of physical therapists and assistants, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 1999, ch. 528, § 10, effective June 21, 1999. The former provisions, excluding those previously transferred, were §§ 63-3-301 — 63-3-310 (Acts 1984, ch. 921, § 4; T.C.A., §§ 63-13-401 — 63-13-410; Acts 1988, ch. 824, §§ 5-16; 1989, ch. 360, § 45; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 33-38; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 86, 112; 1991, ch. 245, §§ 5-13; 1992, ch. 998, §§ 1, 2; 1993, ch. 225, §§ 2, 3; 1994, ch. 901, § 4; 1995, ch. 226, §§ 4-7; 1998, ch. 974, § 1).

Acts 2020, ch. 790, § 17 provided that the act, which amended this section, applies to actions occurring on or after July 15, 2020.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment, deleted former (a)(1) which read: “Must be at least eighteen (18) years of age;”; in (a)(4), substituted “physical therapy program” for “physical therapy education program”, “a national” for “an” and “agency recognized by the United States department of education and by the board of physical therapy” for “agency approved by the board”; deleted former (b)(1) which read: “Must be at least eighteen (18) years of age;”; inserted “, foreign-educated, or internationally trained” in the introductory paragraph of (d); and deleted former (d)(1) which read: “Must be at least eighteen (18) years of age;”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 790, § 17. July 15, 2020.

Cross-References. Licensure, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.

63-13-308. License renewal — Eligibility to apply for physical therapy licensure compact privileges — Changes in name or address — Retirement — Inactive Status — Exemption from continuing education requirements.

A physical therapist or physical therapist assistant licensed under this part shall renew the person's license as specified in the rules. An individual who fails to renew the license by the date of expiration shall not practice physical therapy or function as a physical therapist assistant in this state.

A physical therapist or physical therapist assistant licensed in a jurisdiction that is a member state of the Physical Therapy Licensure Compact is eligible to become a licensee for compact privileges in this state, subject to the requirements in § 63-13-402.

Each licensee shall report to the division a name change and changes in business and home address within thirty (30) days of the change.

A person licensed by the board to the practice of physical therapy in this state who has retired, or may retire, from the practice in this state is not required to register as required by this part if the person files with the board an affidavit on a form to be furnished by the board, which affidavit states the date on which the person retired from the practice and any other facts the board considers necessary that tend to verify the retirement. If the person thereafter reengages in the practice in this state, the person must apply for licensure with the board as provided by this part and meet the continuing education requirements that are established by the board, except for good and sufficient reasons as determined by the board.

A person licensed by the board may place their license on inactive status by filing the proper forms with the board and by paying a biennial fee in accordance with rules. If the person thereafter reengages in active practice of physical therapy in this state, then the person must apply for relicensure with the board as provided by this part and meet the continuing education requirements as are established by the board, except for good and sufficient reasons as determined by the board.

Acts 1999, ch. 528, § 19; 2005, ch. 51, § 1; 2007, ch. 115, § 10; 2020, ch. 790, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 63-13-301 — 63-13-313, was transferred to part 2 of this chapter in 1986.

Former part 3 of this chapter, concerning licensure of physical therapists and assistants, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 1999, ch. 528, § 10, effective June 21, 1999. The former provisions, excluding those previously transferred, were §§ 63-3-301 — 63-3-310 (Acts 1984, ch. 921, § 4; T.C.A., §§ 63-13-401 — 63-13-410; Acts 1988, ch. 824, §§ 5-16; 1989, ch. 360, § 45; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 33-38; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 86, 112; 1991, ch. 245, §§ 5-13; 1992, ch. 998, §§ 1, 2; 1993, ch. 225, §§ 2, 3; 1994, ch. 901, § 4; 1995, ch. 226, §§ 4-7; 1998, ch. 974, § 1).

Acts 2020, ch. 790, § 17 provided that the act, which amended this section, applies to actions occurring on or after July 15, 2020.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment inserted “ — Eligibility to apply for physical therapy licensure compact privileges" in the section heading; substituted “the person's” for “such person's” in the first sentence of (a); added present (b), redesignating former (b) through (d) as present (c) through (e); substituted “A person” for “Any person” in the first sentences of both present (d) and (e); in present (d), in the first sentence, substituted “the practice of physical therapy” for the first occurrence of “practice”, substituted the second and third occurrences of “the practice” for “such practice”, substituted “the person files” for “such person files”, deleted “as” preceding “the board considers” substituted “tend” for “tend” and “the retirement.” for “such retirement.” and rewrote the second sentence which read: “If such person thereafter reengages in practice in this state, such person shall apply for licensure with the board as provided by this part and shall meet such continuing education requirements that are established by the board, except for good and sufficient reasons as determined by the board.”; rewrote the second sentence in present (e) which read: “If such person thereafter reengages in active practice in this state, such person shall apply for relicensure with the board as provided by this part and shall meet such continuing education requirements as are established by the board, except for good and sufficient reasons as determined by the board.”; and deleted former (e) which read: “A licensee who has been continuously licensed in this state since 1960 and who is at least seventy-one (71) years of age shall be exempt from any continuing education requirements imposed by the board under this chapter.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 790, § 17. July 15, 2020.

Cross-References. Licensure, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.

Retirement, § 63-1-111.

63-13-309. Reinstatement of license — Failure to renew license.

Reinstatement of a lapsed license following a renewal deadline requires payment of a renewal fee, a late renewal penalty fee and a reinstatement fee, in accordance with rules promulgated by the board.

Reinstatement of a license that has lapsed for more than three (3) consecutive years requires reapplying for a license and payment of fees in accordance with board rules. The individual shall successfully demonstrate to the board competency in the practice of physical therapy or, shall serve an internship under a restricted license or take remedial courses as determined by the board, or any combination of the preceding, at the board's discretion. The board may also require the applicant to take an examination.

When any license holder fails to renew and pay the biennial renewal fee within sixty (60) days after renewal becomes due, as provided in this section, the license of such person shall be administratively revoked at the expiration of the sixty (60) days after the renewal was required, without further notice or hearing. Any person whose license is administratively revoked, as provided in this subsection (c), may make application in writing to the board for the reinstatement of such license; and, upon good cause being shown, the board, in its discretion, may reinstate such license upon payment of all required fees.

Acts 1999, ch. 528, § 20; 2007, ch. 115, § 10.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 63-13-301 — 63-13-313, was transferred to part 2 of this chapter in 1986.

Former part 3 of this chapter, concerning licensure of physical therapists and assistants, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 1999, ch. 528, § 10, effective June 21, 1999. The former provisions, excluding those previously transferred, were §§ 63-3-301 — 63-3-310 (Acts 1984, ch. 921, § 4; T.C.A., §§ 63-13-401 — 63-13-410; Acts 1988, ch. 824, §§ 5-16; 1989, ch. 360, § 45; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 33-38; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 86, 112; 1991, ch. 245, §§ 5-13; 1992, ch. 998, §§ 1, 2; 1993, ch. 225, §§ 2, 3; 1994, ch. 901, § 4; 1995, ch. 226, §§ 4-7; 1998, ch. 974, § 1).

Cross-References. Licensure, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.

63-13-310. Unlawful use of titles or designations indicating licensure.

A physical therapist shall use the letters “PT” or “DPT”, as appropriate for the individual's education, in connection with their name or place of business to denote licensure under this part.

It is unlawful for any person or for any business entity, its employees, agents or representatives to use in connection with such person's name or the name or activity of the business the words “physical therapy,” “physical therapist,” “physiotherapy,” “physiotherapist,” “registered physical therapist,” “licensed physical therapist,” “doctor of physical therapy,” or the letters “PT,” “LPT,” “DPT,” or “RPT” or any other words, abbreviations or insignia indicating or implying directly or indirectly that physical therapy is provided or supplied, including the billing of services labeled as physical therapy, unless such services are provided by or under the direction of a physical therapist licensed in accordance with this part.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as restricting a person licensed or certified under any other law of this state from engaging in the profession or practice for which the person is licensed or certified; provided, that the person does not claim to be a physical therapist, a physical therapist assistant or a provider of physical therapy.

A physical therapist assistant shall use the letters “PTA” in connection with the person's name to denote licensure.

No person shall use the title “physical therapist assistant” or use the letters “PTA” in connection with the person's name or any other words, abbreviations or insignia indicating or implying, directly or indirectly, that the person is a physical therapist assistant unless the person is licensed as a physical therapist assistant in accordance with this part.

Acts 1999, ch. 528, § 21; 2015, ch. 124, § 5; 2020, ch. 790, § 13.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 63-13-301 — 63-13-313, was transferred to part 2 of this chapter in 1986.

Former part 3 of this chapter, concerning licensure of physical therapists and assistants, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 1999, ch. 528, § 10, effective June 21, 1999. The former provisions, excluding those previously transferred, were §§ 63-3-301 — 63-3-310 (Acts 1984, ch. 921, § 4; T.C.A., §§ 63-13-401 — 63-13-410; Acts 1988, ch. 824, §§ 5-16; 1989, ch. 360, § 45; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 33-38; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 86, 112; 1991, ch. 245, §§ 5-13; 1992, ch. 998, §§ 1, 2; 1993, ch. 225, §§ 2, 3; 1994, ch. 901, § 4; 1995, ch. 226, §§ 4-7; 1998, ch. 974, § 1).

Acts 2020, ch. 790, § 17 provided that the act, which amended this section, applies to actions occurring on or after July 15, 2020.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment inserted “or "DPT", as appropriate for the individual's education,” in (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 790, § 17. July 15, 2020.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of physical therapy board as to chiropractor advertising “physical therapy” services where the services offered are not performed by or under direction of licensed physical therapist. OAG 12-27, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 27 (2/29/12).

63-13-311. Supervision of students and assistive personnel.

Physical therapists are responsible for the patient care given by physical therapist assistants, assistive personnel and students on clinical affiliations under their supervision. The physical therapist may delegate to the physical therapist assistant, assistive personnel and clinical students selected acts, tasks or procedures that fall within the scope of their education or training.

Physical therapist assistants shall at all times be under the supervision of a licensed physical therapist as defined in § 63-13-103 and as further set forth in the rules promulgated by the board.

Physical therapy aides, other assistive personnel and clinical students shall at all times perform patient care activities under the onsite supervision of a licensed physical therapist or physical therapist assistant as defined in § 63-13-103.

Physical therapist students and physical therapist assistant students shall at all times be under the supervision of a physical therapist as further set forth in the rules promulgated by the board.

Acts 1999, ch. 528, § 22.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 63-13-301 — 63-13-313, was transferred to part 2 of this chapter in 1986.